Washington statutes.
RCW 15.19.070

Cooperative agency agreements.

The director may cooperate with and enter into agreements with governmental agencies of this state, other states, and agencies of the federal government in order to carry out the purpose and provisions of this chapter.

[ 1998 c 154 s 27.]